Hawaii statutes.
[§658B-6] Asserting and defending a
foreign-money claim. (a) A claimant may assert a claim in a specified
foreign money. If a foreign money is not asserted, the claimant makes a claim
for a judgment in United States dollars.

(b) An opposing party may allege and prove
that the claim is, in whole or in part, for a different money than that
asserted by the claimant.

(c) Any party may assert a defense, set-off,
recoupment, or counterclaim in any money without regard to the money of other
claims.

(d) The determination of the proper money of
the claim is a question of law. [L 1990, c 50, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next